District of Columbia statutes.
34-708

Each day’s default to constitute separate and distinct offense.

Every day during which any public utility, or any officer, agent, or employee thereof, shall fail knowingly or willfully to observe and comply with any order or direction of the Commission, or to perform any duty enjoined by this section, shall constitute a separate and distinct violation of such order, or direction, or of this subtitle, as the case may be.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 992, ch. 150, § 8, par. 87

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1552.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-310.
1973 Ed., § 43-910.